csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_Ind_C.yaml
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: giwaabamigonaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Incl: giwaabamigoominaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+Incl: giwaabamigosiimin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+Incl: giwaabamigosiimin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: giwaabamigosiinaanig
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: giwaabamigosiinaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Incl: giwaabamigoosiimin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Incl: giwaabamigomin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Incl: giwaabamigomin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: giwaabamigonaanig
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: giwaabamigonaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Incl: giwaabamigoomin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+Incl: giwaabamigosiiminaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+Incl: giwaabamigosiiminaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: giwaabamigosiinaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: giwaabamigosiinaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Incl: giwaabamigoosiiminaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+Incl: giwaabamigominaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+Incl: giwaabamigominaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: giwaabamigonaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: giwaabamigonaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Incl: giwaabamigoominaaban
